Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.11
Department of Administrative Services; state building division; State Building Administrator; compensation.

There is hereby established a division within the Department of Administrative Services to be known as the state building division, to be headed by a State Building Administrator appointed by the Director of Administrative Services. The compensation of such administrator shall be fixed by the Director of Administrative Services subject to availability of appropriations.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 2.